Colorado, session 2026A, HB1132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Native plants are species that have evolved over thousands of
years in ecosystems and are adapted to the local climate, soil, hydrology,
and interactions with wildlife;
(b) Colorado is home to a diverse array of at least 3,300 native plant
species that support critical ecosystem functions, promote biodiversity, and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

contribute to the state's natural heritage and scenic beauty;
(c) Native plants form the foundation of essential habitat and food
sources for pollinators, birds, and other wildlife species, many of which are
in decline due to habitat loss, urbanization, drought, climate change,
invasive species, and other environmental stressors;
(d) Increasing the availability and diversity of native plant materials
used in landscaping, habitat restoration, agriculture, and conservation
efforts helps to conserve water resources, prevent soil erosion, and improve
resilience to drought and wildfire;
(e) Promoting the propagation, protection, and use of native plants
supports the objectives of Colorado's outdoors strategy, the division of
parks and wildlife's statewide habitat conservation and connectivity plan,
the state wildlife action plan, Colorado's climate preparedness roadmap, and
other state and local environmental initiatives;
(f) Coordination among state agencies, growers, seed suppliers, and
community partners is essential to ensure access to native plant materials;
and
(g) Colorado has an opportunity and a responsibility to lead by
example by creating a statewide framework to align efforts, increase
availability and diversity of native plants, and use collective buying power
to reduce the costs of native plant materials to protect Colorado's
environment for future generations.
(2) The general assembly further finds that:
(a) In 2022, in response to Senate Bill 22-199, the department of
natural resources commissioned a collaborative study on native pollinating
insects;
(b) The study was conducted by the Colorado state university
extension, the Xerces Society for Invertebrate Conservation, and the
university of Colorado museum of natural history, in consultation with state
and federal agencies, researchers, scientists, and land managers across the
state;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(c) The study documents how Colorado is home to a rich community
of native insects whose pollinating services are at the heart of healthy
environments and economies, but concludes that, overall, the status of
Colorado's native pollinating insects is tenuous, with the primary drivers of
decline being habitat loss, inadequate land-management practices,
pesticides, competition from nonnative species, and climate change, among
others; and
(d) The study states that promoting policies that benefit native
pollinating insects and increase the native plants on which they depend
represents the biggest opportunity to foster healthy and sustainable
pollinator populations, especially in agricultural and urban habitats, and
identifies the 5 highest areas of immediate action and priorities as follows:
(I) Priority 1: Protect imperiled native pollinating insects;
(II) Priority 2: Protect, restore, and connect pollinator habitats;
(III) Priority 3: Mitigate environmental changes that negatively
impact pollinators and their habitats;
(IV) Priority 4: Reduce the risks from pesticides to pollinating
insects; and
(V) Priority 5: Monitor and support native and managed pollinator
health.
(3) The general assembly further finds that in 2024, in House Bill
24-1117, the general assembly directed the division of parks and wildlife in
the department of natural resources to study and determine the conservation
needs of native rare plants and invertebrates and implement voluntary
programs to conserve and protect them.
(4) Therefore, the general assembly:
(a) Declares that it is in the public interest of the state to promote the
use, protection, and restoration of native plant species for the benefit of
current and future generations; and
(b) Encourages public and private stakeholders to take action to
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

conserve Colorado's native plants.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-31-322 as
follows:
23-31-322. Use of native plants in projects - definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "COVERED AGENCY" MEANS:
(I) THE STATE FOREST SERVICE DESCRIBED WITHIN THIS PART 3;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES CREATED IN SECTION
24-1-124; EXCEPT THAT THE STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS
DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 36 IS NOT A COVERED AGENCY;
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL CREATED IN SECTION
24-1-128; AND
(IV) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CREATED IN SECTION
24-1-128.7.
(b) "ECOREGIONALLY SPECIFIC" MEANS THAT PLANT MATERIALS ARE
SPECIFIC TO A LEVEL III ECOREGION, AS DESIGNATED BY THE UNITED STATES
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY.
(c) "NATIVE PLANT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-5.5-103 (15).
(d) "PROJECT" MEANS A RESTORATION, RENOVATION, LANDSCAPING,
NEW CONSTRUCTION, OR INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT THAT:
(I) IS ON STATE-OWNED LAND;
(II) IS MANAGED ENTIRELY BY ONE OR MORE STATE AGENCIES;
(III) INCLUDES THE INSTALLATION OR PLANTING OF VEGETATION;
AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(IV) DOES NOT RELY SOLELY OR PARTIALLY ON FUNDING FROM
STATE GRANTS OR LOANS.
(e) "PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 24-94-102 (8).
(f) "REGIONAL NURSERY" MEANS A PRIVATELY OWNED NURSERY
THAT COORDINATES WITH THE STATE FOREST SERVICE AND THE STATE
NURSERY.
(g) "SEED WAREHOUSE" MEANS THE ESCALANTE STATE WILDLIFE
AREA SEED STORAGE BUILDING OPERATED BY THE DIVISION OF PARKS AND
WILDLIFE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.
(h) "STATE NURSERY" MEANS THE STATE NURSERY OPERATED BY THE
STATE FOREST SERVICE.
(i) "STUDY" MEANS THE COLLABORATIVE STUDY ON NATIVE
POLLINATING INSECTS COMMISSIONED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES IN 2022 IN RESPONSE TO SENATE BILL 22-199.
(2) Use of native plants in projects.
(a) EACH COVERED AGENCY IS ENCOURAGED TO PRIORITIZE THE USE
OF ECOREGIONALLY SPECIFIC NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL THAT SUPPORTS
POLLINATOR HABITATS WHEN:
(I) SUCH PLANT MATERIAL IS AVAILABLE;
(II) SUCH USE IS FINANCIALLY VIABLE; AND
(III) SUCH PLANT MATERIAL CAN BE USED IN A MANNER THAT
FURTHERS PLANT DIVERSITY, INCREASES POLLINATOR HABITAT, MINIMIZES
WILDFIRE HAZARD MITIGATION, ENHANCES CLIMATE RESILIENCE, AND
PROTECTS WATERSHED HEALTH.
(b) IN PLANNING AND EXECUTING A PROJECT, EACH COVERED
AGENCY SHALL:
(I) BALANCE THE BENEFITS OF USING NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL WITH
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

OTHER PRIORITIES, INCLUDING WILDFIRE RISK REDUCTION; CLIMATE
RESILIENCE; SPECIES PROTECTION AND RECOVERY; FEDERALLY LISTED,
ENDANGERED, AND THREATENED SPECIES PROTECTION; NOXIOUS WEED
CONTROL; PUBLIC SAFETY; AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION; AND EQUITY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS;
(II) CONSIDER ECOLOGICAL SUITABILITY, SITE-SPECIFIC CONDITIONS,
AND AVAILABILITY OF PLANT MATERIALS WHEN SELECTING NATIVE PLANTS;
(III) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, INCLUDE MULTIPLE SPECIES WITH
OVERLAPPING BLOOM PERIODS, INCLUDING A DIVERSITY OF FLOWER SHAPES
AND COLORS, TO PROVIDE NECTAR AND POLLEN RESOURCES THROUGHOUT
THE GROWING SEASON; AND
(IV) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICAL, INCLUDE A MIXTURE OF GRASSES,
FORBS, SHRUBS, AND TREES IN ORDER TO PROVIDE A DIVERSE VEGETATIVE
STRUCTURE.
(c) EACH COVERED AGENCY SHALL INTEGRATE INTO ITS PLANNING
PROCESSES FIVE-YEAR AND TEN-YEAR GOALS FOR NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL
USE IN THEIR PROJECTS.
(3) Coordinated purchasing and supply development.
(a) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, EACH COVERED AGENCY SHALL
COORDINATE WITH THE OTHER COVERED AGENCIES WITH REGARD TO
PURCHASING IN ORDER TO:
(I) INCREASE DEMAND FOR ECOREGIONALLY SPECIFIC NATIVE PLANT
MATERIAL BUSINESS GROWTH OPPORTUNITIES;
(II) REDUCE COSTS THROUGH PURCHASING POWER;
(III) ENSURE SUPPLY OF APPROPRIATE NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL AND
REASONABLE PROPAGATION AND GROWING TIMELINES;
(IV) USE THEIR COLLECTIVE BUYING POWER TO CREATE AN
INCREASED SUPPLY OF NATIVE PLANTS AND NATIVE PLANT SEEDS; AND
(V) ENHANCE THE SUPPLY OF, AND ACCESS TO, ECOREGIONALLY
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

SPECIFIC NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL IN STATE AND PRIVATE NURSERIES AND
IN STATE COLLECTIONS OF SEEDS TO INCREASE ACCESS AND DIVERSITY.
(b) EACH COVERED AGENCY, IN FULFILLING ITS DUTIES UNDER THIS
SECTION, SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE SEED WAREHOUSE, THE STATE
NURSERY, AND REGIONAL NURSERIES. THE STATE NURSERY SHALL
ANNUALLY SHARE ITS INVENTORY WITH COVERED AGENCIES WHEN THE
SPRING INVENTORY IS ESTABLISHED.
(c) A COVERED AGENCY MAY ENTER INTO A PUBLIC-PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP FOR SEED COLLECTION ON STATE LANDS.
(4) Training on native plants.
(a) EACH COVERED AGENCY, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING,
SHALL ESTABLISH A TRAINING PROGRAM FOR RELEVANT STAFF, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COVERED AGENCY, THAT INCLUDES:
(I) IDENTIFICATION OF NATIVE PLANTS, IMPORTANT FLORAL AND
HOST PLANTS, AND POLLINATOR HOST SPECIES; AND
(II) BEST PRACTICES FOR POLLINATOR CONSERVATION AND NATIVE
PLANT ESTABLISHMENT.
(b) IN FULFILLING ITS DUTIES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (4), A
COVERED AGENCY MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND AVAILABLE FEDERAL
RESOURCES REGARDING THE MANAGEMENT OF NATIVE PLANTS.
(c) A COVERED AGENCY MAY SEEK AND ENTER INTO PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIPS TO DEVELOP THE TRAINING PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (4) SO LONG AS THE PRIVATE PARTNERS HAVE EXPERTISE IN
POLLINATOR HEALTH, CLIMATE CHANGE, ECOLOGICAL PROCESSES AND
RESILIENCE, BIODIVERSITY, NATIVE PLANTS, OR ECOLOGICAL LAND
MANAGEMENT.
(5) Land management practices.
(a) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
EACH COVERED AGENCY SHALL INTEGRATE MOWING AND GRAZING BASED ON
RECOMMENDATIONS INCLUDED IN THE STUDY.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(b) EACH COVERED AGENCY, AS APPROPRIATE, SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH POLLINATOR HABITAT ZONES ON ROADWAYS AND ON
PUBLIC LANDS;
(II) USE SIGNAGE TO IDENTIFY SUCH ZONES; AND
(III) PROHIBIT THE MOWING OF GRASS WITHIN SUCH A ZONE, EXCEPT
AS MAY BE NECESSARY FOR PUBLIC SAFETY.
(IV) INCORPORATE INTERSEEDING, OVERSEEDING, AND
TRANSPLANTING OF NATIVE PLANTS AND NATIVE PLANT MATERIALS,
INCLUDING FOR THE RESTORATION OF NATIVE HABITATS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-30-1303, add
(1)(gg) as follows:
24-30-1303. Office of the state architect - responsibilities.
(1) The office of the state architect shall:
(gg) SUPPORT AND ENCOURAGE THE DEVELOPMENT AND
RENOVATION OF SUSTAINABLE SITES TO MAXIMIZE POLLINATOR HEALTH ON
PROPERTIES WITHIN THE STATE CAPITOL COMPLEX, OTHER STATE BUILDINGS,
AND, WHERE APPLICABLE, ON LEASED PROPERTY, INCLUDING BY:
(I) MAXIMIZING THE USE OF NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL AND
POLLINATOR-FRIENDLY PLANTS IN LANDSCAPE DESIGN PLANS;
(II) MODIFYING THE STATE'S DESIGN GUIDELINES TO INCORPORATE
NATIVE PLANTS AND POLLINATOR-FRIENDLY PLANTS;
(III) ENSURING THAT STATE-FUNDED PROJECTS USE PESTICIDE-FREE
MANAGEMENT PRACTICES TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE; AND
(IV) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, ENSURING THAT STATE
CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE OF PLANTS REQUIRE SUCH PLANTS TO NOT
CONTAIN SYNTHETIC PESTICIDES.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-31-708 as
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

follows:
23-31-708. Colorado native plant availability study - legislative
declaration - consulting parties - study components - gifts, grants, and
donations - report - definition - repeal.
(1) Legislative declaration.
(a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(I) THE COLLABORATIVE STUDY ON NATIVE POLLINATING INSECTS
COMMISSIONED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES IN 2022 IN
RESPONSE TO SENATE BILL 22-199 IDENTIFIED HABITAT LOSS AS A PRIMARY
THREAT TO POLLINATOR HEALTH AND THE INSUFFICIENT AVAILABILITY OF
NECESSARY NATIVE PLANTS AND SEEDS AS A MAJOR LIMITING FACTOR TO
CREATING POLLINATOR HABITATS; AND
(II) THE STUDY ALSO RECOMMENDED THAT THE STATE TAKE ACTION
TO ENCOURAGE THE INCREASE OF NATIVE PLANT AND SEED PRODUCTION AND
USE STATEWIDE.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALSO FINDS THAT:
(I) DESPITE GROWING INTEREST IN NATIVE PLANTS, COLORADO
LACKS A COMPREHENSIVE, COORDINATED UNDERSTANDING OF STATEWIDE
NATIVE PLANT SUPPLY AND DEMAND, INCLUDING AN UNDERSTANDING OF:
(A) BARRIERS FACED BY GROWERS, DISTRIBUTORS, LAND MANAGERS,
AND CONSUMERS; AND
(B) OPPORTUNITIES FOR IMPROVING THE SUPPLY OF NATIVE PLANT
MATERIAL;
(II) STRATEGIC STATE COORDINATION CAN STRENGTHEN PRIVATE
MARKETS, REDUCE RISK FOR GROWERS, SUPPORT CONSERVATION GOALS,
AND ENSURE THAT PUBLIC INVESTMENTS IN RESTORATION AND
LANDSCAPING ACHIEVE LONG-TERM ECOLOGICAL BENEFITS; AND
(III) THE SERVICE, IN PARTNERSHIP WITH STATE AGENCIES AND
STAKEHOLDERS, IS UNIQUELY POSITIONED TO CONDUCT A RIGOROUS,
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

IMPARTIAL, AND APPLIED STUDY TO INFORM MARKET DEVELOPMENT.
(c) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT IT IS IN
THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE STATE TO DIRECT THE SERVICE TO PERFORM A
STATEWIDE STUDY TO ASSESS THE NATIVE PLANT SUPPLY CHAIN.
(2) Study - consulting agencies - definition. THE SERVICE SHALL
PERFORM A COLORADO NATIVE PLANT AVAILABILITY STUDY, REFERRED TO
IN THIS SECTION AS THE "STUDY". IN PERFORMING THE STUDY, THE SERVICE
SHALL CONSULT WITH:
(a) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(b) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
(c) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
(d) THE STATE FOREST SERVICE;
(e) SEED AND PLANT WAREHOUSES AND NURSERIES IN THE STATE;
(f) PUBLIC AND PRIVATE NATIVE SEED AND PLANT GROWERS;
(g) LANDSCAPE PROFESSIONALS, RESTORATION CONTRACTORS, AND
NURSERY OPERATORS;
(h) TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS, WHERE APPROPRIATE;
(i) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND WATER PROVIDERS; AND
(j) CONSERVATION ORGANIZATIONS AND RESEARCHERS.
(3) Study scope and requirements.
(a) THE STUDY MUST INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS OF THE SUPPLY OF
NATIVE PLANT MATERIAL IN THE STATE, WHICH ANALYSIS INCLUDES:
(I) AN ASSESSMENT OF CURRENT NATIVE PLANT AND SEED
PRODUCTION IN COLORADO, INCLUDING:
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(A) SPECIES AVAILABILITY;
(B) PRODUCTION CAPACITY;
(C) GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF GROWERS AND SELLERS; AND
(D) CONSTRAINTS, SUCH AS LAND, LABOR, WATER, SOURCE SEED
AND PLANT ACCESS, GENETICS, AND REGULATORY BARRIERS;
(II) IDENTIFICATION OF POSSIBLE GROWER CONCERNS, INCLUDING
BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
(A) MARKET UNCERTAINTY AND INCONSISTENT DEMAND;
(B) UP-FRONT INVESTMENT RISKS;
(C) SEED AND PLANT SOURCING AND GENETIC INTEGRITY;
(D) CONTRACT RELIABILITY AND PAYMENT TIMING; AND
(E) PROPAGATION COMPLEXITIES AND KNOWLEDGE GAPS
CONCERNING NATIVE SPECIES; AND
(III) EVALUATION OF WEAK POINTS IN THE SUPPLY CHAIN, INCLUDING
CONSIDERATION OF:
(A) SEED COLLECTION AND STORAGE;
(B) DISTRIBUTION AND TRANSPORTATION CHALLENGES; AND
(C) REGIONAL MISMATCHES BETWEEN PRODUCTION AND DEMAND.
(b) THE STUDY MUST CONSIDER EDUCATION, TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE, AND KNOWLEDGE GAPS, INCLUDING;
(I) IDENTIFICATION OF GAPS IN CURRENT KNOWLEDGE AMONG
GROWERS, DESIGNERS, CONTRACTORS, AND CONSUMERS;
(II) EVALUATION OF EXISTING EDUCATION PROGRAMS AND
IDENTIFICATION OF UNMET NEEDS; AND
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(III) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR TARGETED EDUCATION, TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE, AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING THE ROLE OF THE
SERVICE.
(c) THE STUDY MUST INCLUDE BEST PRACTICES FOR ACQUIRING AND
USING NATIVE PLANTS AND SEEDS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING IDENTIFICATION
OF:
(I) BEST PRACTICES FROM COLORADO AND OTHER STATES FOR
EXPANDING NATIVE PLANT MARKETS;
(II) INCREMENTAL STRATEGIES TO GROW SUPPLY AND DEMAND
CONCURRENTLY; AND
(III) POTENTIAL INCENTIVES, INCLUDING CONTRACTING AND
INCENTIVE REFORMS, COST-SHARE PROGRAMS, PILOT PURCHASE
AGREEMENTS, CERTIFICATION OR LABELING PROGRAMS, AND
PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS.
(4) Report.
(a) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2031, THE SERVICE SHALL ISSUE A
REPORT SUMMARIZING THE RESULTS OF THE STUDY. THE SERVICE SHALL
MAKE THE REPORT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON ITS WEBSITE AND PROVIDE
COPIES OF THE REPORT TO:
(I) THE GOVERNOR; AND
(II) THE AGRICULTURE, WATER, AND NATURAL RESOURCES
COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE AGRICULTURE
AND NATURAL RESOURCES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, OR TO ANY
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
(b) THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS, INCLUDING:
(I) SHORT-TERM, MEDIUM-TERM, AND LONG-TERM STRATEGIES TO
INCREASE SUPPLY OF NATIVE PLANTS AND SEEDS INCREMENTALLY;
(II) OPPORTUNITIES FOR PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS; AND
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

(III) METRICS TO MEASURE PROGRESS AND EFFECTIVENESS OVER
TIME.
(5) Gifts, grants, and donations.
(a) THE SERVICE MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
AND DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSE OF
IMPLEMENTING THIS SECTION.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, THE SERVICE IS NOT REQUIRED TO PERFORM THE DUTIES
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION UNLESS AND UNTIL THE SERVICE ACQUIRES
SUFFICIENT GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS TO PAY FOR THE PERFORMANCE
OF SUCH DUTIES ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2030.
(6) Repeal. THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1,
2031.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1132

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1132